Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Department of Revenue.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the department to consult with the Alaska Energy Authority on a plan for developing infrastructure to deliver more affordable energy to areas of the state that are not expected to have direct access to a North Slope natural gas pipeline, as well as a plan for funding that infrastructure, to be provided by the Alaska Energy Authority to the legislature before January 1, 2017, see sec. 75, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Collateral references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 107-115.

84 C.J.S. Taxation §§ 700, 707-711.

Sec. 43.05.010.
Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner of revenue shall

exercise general supervision and direct the activities of the Department of Revenue;

supervise the fiscal affairs and responsibilities of the department;

prescribe uniform rules for investigations and hearings;

keep a record of all departmental proceedings, record and file all bonds, and assume custody of returns, reports, papers, and documents of the department;

adopt a seal and affix it to each order, process, or certificate issued by the commissioner;

keep a record of each order, process, and certificate issued by the commissioner, and keep the record open to public inspection at all reasonable times;

hold hearings and investigations necessary for the administration of state tax and revenue laws;

except as provided in AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

and in AS

44.64.030

, hear and determine appeals of a matter within the jurisdiction of the Department of Revenue and enter orders on the appeals that are final unless reversed or modified by the courts;

issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses and the production of necessary books, papers, documents, correspondence, and other things;

order the taking of depositions before a person competent to administer oaths;

administer oaths and take acknowledgments;

request the attorney general for rulings on the interpretation of the tax and revenue laws administered by the department;

call upon the attorney general to institute actions for recovery of unpaid taxes, fees, excises, additions to tax, penalties, and interest;

issue warrants for the collection of unpaid tax penalties and interest and take all steps necessary and proper to enforce full and complete compliance with the tax, license, excise, and other revenue laws of the state;

report to the legislature before February 15 of each year the total amount of contributions reported and the total amount of credit claimed during the previous calendar year under AS

43.20.014

, AS

43.55.019

, AS

43.56.018

, AS

43.65.018

, AS

43.75.018

, and AS

43.77.045

;

consult with the commissioner of natural resources on negotiation of contracts and development of terms for inclusion in proposed contracts associated with a North Slope natural gas project;

direct the disposition of revenue received from gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

by entering into agreements with the commissioner of natural resources related to the management of the custody and disposition of gas delivered to the state under AS

43.55.014(b)

.

History.

(§ 48-2-9 ACLA 1949; § 7-1-8 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 61 SLA 1980; am § 13 ch 161 SLA 1984; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 7 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 92 SLA 2003; am § 62 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 12 ch 92 SLA 2010; am §§ 40, 41 ch 14 SLA 2014; am § 21 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Delayed repeal of paragraph (15). —

Under secs. 21 and 37,
ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by sec. 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, paragraph (15) is repealed January 1, 2025.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the commissioner to identify a range of financing options for state acquisition of an ownership interest and participation in a North Slope natural gas project, and to develop a plan and suggested legislation to allow a municipality, regional corporation, or resident of the state to participate as a co-owner in a North Slope natural gas pipeline, and to present both to the legislature at the time the commissioner of natural resources submits the first agreement or contract to the legislature for approval under AS

38.05.020(b)(11)

, see sec. 76, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the department to consult with the Alaska Energy Authority on a plan for developing infrastructure to deliver more affordable energy to areas of the state that are not expected to have direct access to a North Slope natural gas pipeline as well as a plan for funding that infrastructure, to be provided by the Alaska Energy Authority to the legislature before January 1, 2017, see sec. 75, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, which added paragraphs (16) and (17), see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For application of tax, see 15 AAC 21, art. 1.

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section does not require publication of hearing decisions, even though they are technically orders of the commissioner and subject to the publication requirement of this section, since this section must be read in conjunction with AS

43.05.230

, and, in addition, AS

09.25.100

(now AS

40.25.100

), both of which prohibit disclosure of the “particulars” of the business of a taxpayer except when in connection with investigations or court proceedings. June 16, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

When the taxpayer files the notice of appeal, a Department of Revenue hearing decision may be made public because the taxpayer is, in effect, waiving any right to confidentiality he may have had. June 16, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen., modifying March 12, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

The department can publish decisions that have not been appealed or for which confidentiality was not voluntarily waived if it establishes guidelines for publication to protect a taxpayer’s identity. June 16, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.05.020.
Collection agencies.

The commissioner may employ a collection agency outside the state to assist in the collection of revenue owed to the state.
The commissioner may pay for these services by entering into contingent fee agreements the commissioner considers reasonable, or by the payment of amounts out of the proper appropriation for the department the commissioner considers reasonable.

History.

(§ 48-2-9(y) 1949; § 1 ch 100 SLA 1960)

Sec. 43.05.025.
Audit agents.

The commissioner may employ agents outside the state to assist in the audit of books and records located outside the state. Agents employed under this section are subject to the restrictions of AS

43.05.230

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1976)

Sec. 43.05.030.
Branch offices.

The department may establish branch offices essential for the efficient administration of its duties.

History.

(§ 48-2-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 43.05.040.
Inspection of records or premises and issuance of subpoenas.

The department may examine the books, papers, records, or memoranda of any person to ascertain the correctness of a return filed or to determine whether a tax is due, or in an investigation or inspection in connection with tax matters. The records and the premises where a business is conducted shall be open at all reasonable times for official inspection, and the department may subpoena any person to appear and produce books, records, papers, or memoranda bearing upon tax matters and to give testimony or answer interrogatories under oath respecting tax matters. The department may administer oaths to persons who are so subpoenaed. A subpoena issued under this section may compel attendance of a witness or production of a document or thing, located either inside or outside the state, to the maximum extent permitted by law.

A subpoena may be served by the commissioner of public safety or a peace officer designated by the commissioner of public safety, by a person designated by the Department of Revenue, or as otherwise provided by law. A subpoena may also be served by registered or certified mail for delivery restricted only to the person subpoenaed. The return delivery receipt must be addressed so that the receipt is returned to the department.

If a person who is subpoenaed neglects or refuses to obey the subpoena issued as provided in this section, the department may report the fact to the superior court or the appropriate court of another jurisdiction, and may seek an order from the court compelling obedience to the subpoena. The court, to the maximum extent permitted by law, may compel obedience to the subpoena to the same extent as witnesses may be compelled to obey the subpoenas of the court.

History.

(§ 48-2-12(a), (b) ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 61 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 8 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 92 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For special rules: water transportation carriers, see 15 AAC 19, art. 11.

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 43.05.045.
Electronic submission of return or report.

Unless an exemption is granted under (b) of this section, a taxpayer required to submit a return or report for a tax levied under this title or for any other tax administered by the department shall submit the return or report electronically in a format prescribed by the department. Failure to comply with this section may result in a civil penalty under AS

43.05.220(f)

. If a law under this title requires a report or return or a portion of a report or return to be in writing, an electronically filed report or return satisfies this section. A taxpayer shall submit attachments to a report or return required under this title electronically.

To request an exemption to (a) of this section, a taxpayer shall submit to the department evidence satisfactory to the department that the taxpayer does not have the capability to submit the return or report electronically. An application for an exemption must be submitted before a return or report is due. An exemption granted under this subsection is valid for five years after the first tax filing due date after the exemption is granted. When an exemption under this subsection expires, the taxpayer may apply for another exemption. An exemption granted under this subsection applies to any return or report submitted to the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 9, ch. 20, SLA 2016, makes this section effective July 1, 2016.

Sec. 43.05.050.
Return by department upon failure to make return or making false or fraudulent return.

If a person fails to file a return at the time prescribed by law or by regulation, or makes, wilfully or otherwise, a false or fraudulent return, the department shall make the return from the information it obtains.
A return made by the department is prima facie good and sufficient for all legal purposes.

History.

(§ 48-2-13 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 43.05.060.
Agreements with department respecting liability.

The department may enter into an agreement with a person relating to the liability of the person, or of a person or estate the person represents, for a tax, license fee, or excise tax for a period ending before the date of the agreement.
If the agreement is approved by the attorney general, the agreement is final and conclusive and, except upon a showing of fraud or malfeasance, or misrepresentation of a material fact, the case may not be reopened as to the matters agreed upon or the agreement modified.
In a suit or proceeding relating to the tax liability of the taxpayer the agreement may not be annulled, modified, set aside, or disregarded.

History.

(§ 48-2-14 ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Whenever the department agrees to accept less than the full amount of tax or penalty that has been assessed (as distinguished from making a correction to an assessment in the course of an administrative appeal under AS

43.05.240

), the department has compromised the tax or penalty within the meaning of AS

43.05.070

, and the attorney general’s approval is required. December 3, 1990, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.05.070.
Compromise of tax or penalty.

If in the opinion of the department there is doubt as to the liability of the taxpayer for or the collectibility of a tax, license fee, or excise tax, the department, with the approval of the attorney general, may compromise the tax.

The department, with the approval of the attorney general, may, for cause shown, compromise a penalty accruing under the state tax, license, or excise tax laws.

History.

(§ 48-2-15(a), (c) ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Whenever the department agrees to accept less than the full amount of tax or penalty that has been assessed (as distinguished from making a correction to an assessment in the course of an administrative appeal under AS

43.05.240

), the department has compromised the tax or penalty within the meaning of this section, and the attorney general’s approval is required.
December 3, 1990, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.05.075.
Concealing or falsifying evidence.

A person may not knowingly, in connection with a compromise or offer of a compromise under AS

43.05.070

or in connection with a closing agreement or offer to enter a closing agreement under AS

43.05.060

,

conceal from an officer or employee of the state property belonging to the estate of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax; or

receive, destroy, mutilate, or falsify a book, document, or record or make a false statement under oath relating to the estate or the financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

History.

(§ 22 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Sec. 43.05.080.
Adoption of regulations.

The department shall adopt and publish regulations necessary for the enforcement of the tax, license, or excise tax laws administered by it.
The department shall prepare and distribute all forms necessary or useful in the administration of tax, license, and excise tax laws.

History.

(§ 48-2-16 ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For enforcement, see 15 AAC 10.

For division of income, see 15 AAC 19, art. 1.

For taxable in another state, see 15 AAC 19, art. 2.

For apportionment formula, see 15 AAC 19, art. 3.

For property factor, see 15 AAC 19, art. 4.

For payroll factor, see 15 AAC 19, art. 5.

For sales factor, see 15 AAC 19, art. 6.

For special rules: airlines, see 15 AAC 19, art. 8.

For special rules: land transportation carriers, see 15 AAC 19, art. 9.

For special rules: construction contractors, see 15 AAC 19, art. 10.

For special rules: water transportation carriers, see 15 AAC 19, art. 11.

For corporate net income tax; administration and credits, see 15 AAC 20, art. 2.

For corporate net income tax; combination and apportionment rules, see 15 AAC 20, art. 3.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for oil and gas corporations, see 15 AAC 20, art. 4.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for financial organizations and, see 15 AAC 20, art. 6.

For application of tax, see 15 AAC 21, art. 1.

For taxable income from oil and gas production, see 15 AAC 21, art. 2.

For taxable income from oil and gas pipelines, see 15 AAC 21, art. 3.

For taxable income apportioned to Alaska, see 15 AAC 21, art. 4.

For transition rules, see 15 AAC 21, art. 5.

For administration, see 15 AAC 21, art. 6.

For collection of tax, see 15 AAC 40, art. 4.

For tax return filing requirements; filing credits, see 15 AAC 40, art. 5.

For refunds, see 15 AAC 40, art. 6.

For qualified dealer license and bonding requirements, see 15 AAC 40, art. 7.

For licensing, see 15 AAC 50, art. 1.

For taxation, see 15 AAC 50, art. 2.

For vehicle rental tax, see 15 AAC 52, art. 1.

For excise tax on travel aboard commercial passenger vessels, see 15 AAC 52, art. 2.

For gross value at the point of production of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 1.

For production tax value of oil and gas, see 15 AAC 55, art. 2.

For tax credits, see 15 AAC 55, art. 3.

For levy of tax, see 15 AAC 55, art. 4.

For payments and reporting, see 15 AAC 55, art. 5.

For oil and gas exploration, production and pipeline transportation property tax, see 15 AAC 56.

For administration, see 15 AAC 60, art. 1.

For warehouses, see 15 AAC 60, art. 2.

For licensing and filing requirements, see 15 AAC 65, art. 1.

For computation of tax, see 15 AAC 65, art. 2.

For exemption from tax, see 15 AAC 65, art. 3.

For tax on fisheries business, see 15 AAC 75, art. 1.

For tax imposed on acquisition of fisheries resources, see 15 AAC 75, art. 2.

For tax imposition, see 15 AAC 76, art. 1.

For salmon acquired by buyers, see 15 AAC 76, art. 2.

For salmon prices, see 15 AAC 80.

For tire fees, see 15 AAC 98.

For license officers, see 15 AAC 116, art. 1.

For licensing, see 15 AAC 116, art. 2.

For seafood marketing assessment on processors, see 15 AAC 116, art. 4.

For tax on gaming or gambling activities aboard large passenger vessels, see 15 AAC 165, art. 1.

Sec. 43.05.085.
List of contributions.

The commissioner shall prepare and furnish to the Alaska Public Offices Commission by July 1 of each year a list containing the total amount of contributions received by each candidate and group for which a credit was received by an individual under AS

43.20.013(a)

.
The commissioner shall also mail a copy of the list to each of the candidates and groups which were recipients of those credited contributions.
The list becomes public information under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

on its delivery to the Alaska Public Offices Commission.

History.

(§ 4 ch 76 SLA 1974; am § 111 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120.

Sec. 43.05.090.
Preparation and publication of statistics.

The department shall prepare and annually publish statistics of the revenues derived under the tax laws administered by it.

History.

(§ 48-2-17 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 43.05.095.
Indirect expenditure report.

The commissioner shall, not later than July 1 before the first regular session of each legislature, submit a report to the chair of the finance committee of each house of the legislature and to the legislative finance division that states, for each indirect expenditure made by the state,

the name of the indirect expenditure;

a brief description of the indirect expenditure;

the statutory authority for the indirect expenditure;

the date the statute authorizing the indirect expenditure is to be repealed, if applicable;

the intent of the legislature in enacting the statute authorizing the indirect expenditure;

the public purpose served by the indirect expenditure;

the estimated annual effect on revenue of the indirect expenditure for the previous five fiscal years, excluding the fiscal year immediately preceding the date the report is due;

the estimated cost to administer the indirect expenditure, if applicable;

the number of beneficiaries of the indirect expenditure.

For purposes of (a) of this section, federal tax credits adopted under AS

43.20.021

shall be reported in the aggregate.

A department, agency, or public corporation of the state shall, upon the request of the commissioner, provide the records, reports, data analysis, or other information necessary for the commissioner to complete the report required by this section. The commissioner may enter into a confidentiality agreement if necessary to obtain information or a record required to prepare the report under this section.

In this section, “indirect expenditure” means an express provision of state law that results in foregone revenue for the state by providing

a tax credit or other credit;

an exemption, but does not include federal tax exemptions adopted by reference in AS

43.20.021

;

a discount;

a deduction, but does not include costs incurred in the ordinary course of business that are deducted in the calculation of a tax under this title or in the calculation of a royalty or net profit share payment for a lease issued under AS 38;

a differential allowance.

History.

(§ 11 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Sec. 43.05.100.
Designation of depositories and deposit of money.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 149 SLA 1978.]

The department may designate banks in the state as depositaries of tax revenues and may deposit tax revenues in these banks.

History.

(§ 48-2-18 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 149 SLA 1978)

Sec. 43.05.110.
Property in possession of deceased employee.

The personal representative of a deceased employee of the department who has possession or control of a tax list, record, return, paper, document, or book or money collected shall deliver it to the department.

History.

(§ 48-2-19 ACLA 1949; am § 23 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Sec. 43.05.120.
Concealing property or evidence. [Repealed, § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 43.05.130.
Penalty.

A person who, by conduct not described in
AS

43.05.290

, violates a provision of
AS

43.05.010

—

43.05.130

or a regulation adopted under those provisions is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation.

History.

(§ 48-2-12 (c) ACLA 1949; am § 24 ch 168 SLA 1990)